src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
## Palatalization
```
 %{bb́%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dd́%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{ff́%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gǵ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{hh́%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kḱ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{lĺ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{mḿ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{nń%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pṕ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{rŕ%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{sś%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{tt́%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{vv́%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{ḱǵj%}   — HJK and KimmoK ideas laǵa:la%{ḱǵj%}a
 %{zź%}    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dd́n%}  
```

** %^I7         **  This appears in stem vaoma:va%^I7o for vaio
** %^K7         **  This appears in stem väemä:vä%^K7e for väkeq
** %^V7         **  This appears in stem häömä:hä%^V7ö for hävvü
** %^T7         **  This appears in stem kaoma:ka%^T7o for katoq
** %^Y7         **  This appears for syna = s%^Y7na and is rendered as õ in the norm

And following triggers to control variation
%^ErrorBack	 +Err/Orth+Clt:%>kinaq in front harmony context BHARM disallowance

 %^CC2C 	 att%^CC2C%>m%{aä%} atma
 %^OO2Õ		  joo%^OO2Õ%>i:j0õ0%>i
 %^PSS		 vowel in passive tahetu, sõidõtu, eletü

 %^ÄI2ÄÄ  päiv%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä: päävä
 %{PrsSg1%}  — this helps with %{eõ%}:i̬

%^StrD2T  This changes g,d,b, => k,t,p

** %^VowRM  ** this will remove stem final vowel
** %^CnsRM  ** this will remove stem final consonant tervüs:tervü
** %^StrGStem ** This strengthens "perädü" to "perätüt"
 **%^NoGrad**
** %^WGStem ** This weakens
 %^G1	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 0, also t, k
 %^G2	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 b, also t, k
 %^G3	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 p, also t, k
 %^G4	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for p p, also t, k "sõda" to "sõtta"
%^ShortGStem   — This shortens "pu%{tØ%}tu" to "putma", an orthographic convension
%^LongGStem     — This lengthens "pu%{tØ%}tu" to "puttuq"
 %^Pen	       This moves us to penultimate coda
 %^PAL	       — Palatalization
 %^NoPAL       — NoPalatalization
%^JI20	       — in vari: vaŕo
%^JI2I	       — in vari vari
%^JI2J	       — in vari: varjo

%^PenWGStem  This weakens "kipõń" to "kibõna"

** %^PenVowRM ** syncope tapõld : taplõma

**%^D2S	  ** käsi, susi
%^TS2S  The -ts- => -s-
%^I2J  The i => j change

** %^PLPRT ** The a:o attested in Plural kana:kanno and prt
**%^VOWRaise      ** Raises vowel
**%^VOWLower  ** Lowers vowel
**%^XLowerVow ** Lowers vowel two levels
**%^VOWLowerDelab ** Lowers vowel and delabializes it
**%^XLowerVowDelab ** Lowers vowel two levels and delabializes it
%^U2E  lowers u:õ and ü:e delabializes and lowers
%^U2A  lowers u:a and ü:ä delabializes and lowers

**∑** = a symbol used in front of `#` to block backtracking and
mwe reanalysis in hfst-tokenise (e.g. in dynanic compounds).
Makes it possible to distinguish lexical and dynamic compounds
in rules. It is converted to zero together with `#`.

| Flag | Explanation
| ---- | ----------- 
|  @D.ErrOrth.ON@ 
|  @C.ErrOrth@ 
|  @P.ErrOrth.ON@ 
|  @R.ErrOrth.ON@ 

* **@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@**:

* **+Gram/TAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation (it needs an argument)
* **+Gram/NoAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviations that are homonymous
with more frequent words. They should only be considered
abbreviations in the middle of a sentence.
* **+Gram/TNumAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation if the following
constituent is numeric
* **+Gram/NumNoAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviations for which numerals
are complements and normal words. The abbreviation usage
is less common and thus only the occurences in the middle of
the sentence can be considered as true cases.
* **+Gram/TIAbbr**:  Both transitive and intransitive abbreviation
* **+Gram/IAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviation (it takes no argument)
* **+Gram/3syll**: trisyllabic verbs
; +Gram/Superl 
; +Gram/Comp 

# Oahpa Place names and case used 
* **+%<plc_ine%>  **:  Ine, Ill, Ela
* **+%<plc_ade%>  **:  Ade, All, Abl
* **+%<pcl_pääl%> **:  pääl, pääle, päält

The tagged part of the compound should make a compound using:

* **+CmpN/SgN** Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgG** Singular Genitive

# Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using the following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow
compounds with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  **@P.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  **@D.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  **@C.NeedNoun@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  **@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@** | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  **@D.CmpPref.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  **@P.CmpPref.FALSE@** | Block these words from making further compounds
|  **@D.CmpLast.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering R
|  **@D.CmpNone.TRUE@** | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@U.CmpNone.FALSE@** | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@** | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  **@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@** | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

|  **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

|  **@U.Case.Abe@** | Abessive
|  **@U.Case.Abl@** | Ablative
|  **@U.Case.Ade@** | Adessive
|  **@U.Case.All@** | Allative
|  **@U.Case.Com@** | Comitative
|  **@U.Case.Ela@** | Elative
|  **@U.Case.Gen@** | Genitive
|  **@U.Case.Ill@** | Illative
|  **@U.Case.Ine@** | Inessive
|  **@U.Case.Nom@** | Nominative
|  **@U.Case.Par@** | Partitive
|  **@U.Case.Ter@** | Terminative
|  **@U.Case.Tra@** | Translative

|  **@U.Number.Pl@** | Plural
|  **@U.Number.Sg@** | Singular

The following flag diacritics are being applied for vowel harmony variation
|  **@U.VowHarm.B@** | Back harmony, used with subsequent Err/Orth-front
|  **@U.VowHarm.F@** | Front harmony, used with subsequent Err/Orth-back

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
# The Root lexicon

The word forms in the Võro language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
* **adpositions ;**
* **adverbs ;**
* **conjunctors ;**
* **interjections ;**
* **pronouns ;**
* **PronounTypes ;**
* **Punctuation ;**
* **Symbols ;**
* **numerals ;**
look at verb_newwords.lexc

* **Exceptions ;**
* **Abbreviation ;**
* **Acronym ;**

Incoming
* **A_NEWWORDS ;**
* **ADP_NEWWORDS ;**
* **ADV_NEWWORDS ;** 
* **DET_NEWWORDS ;**
* **INTERJ_NEWWORDS ;**
* **N_NEWWORDS ;**
* **@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_NEWWORDS ;**
* **@U.Cap.Opt@ PROP_NEWWORDS ;**
* **V_NEWWORDS ;**
* **GenitiveAttributes ;** Borrowed from experimental_languages est
* **NUM-PREFIXES ;** copied from giella-shared/smi

less complex word classes

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
